Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2709
Receipt for custodial property.

A written acknowledgment of delivery by a custodian constitutes a sufficient receipt and discharge for custodial property transferred to the custodian pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 9.